Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297E.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Appropriation; stadium improvements. new text end new text begin (a) By March 15, 2026, and each year thereafter, the commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must calculate the difference between: new text end new text begin (1) the amount of revenue from the tax imposed under subdivision 6, after the disposition under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), and the appropriation under subdivision 3, paragraph (c), attributable to the conduct of electronic pull-tabs in the immediately preceding fiscal year; and new text end new text begin (2) the amount of revenue from the tax imposed under subdivision 6, after the disposition under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), and the appropriation under subdivision 3, paragraph (c), attributable to the conduct of electronic pull-tabs in the base year. new text end new text begin (b) If the amount calculated under paragraph (a) is greater than zero, ... percent of the amount calculated under paragraph (a), up to the maximum amount, is annually appropriated by August 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, from the general fund to the Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority for stadium improvements. new text end new text begin (c) Beginning July 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the commissioner must adjust the maximum amount in paragraph (d) as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is taxable year 2025. The amounts as adjusted must be rounded down to the nearest $50 amount. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "base year" means fiscal year 2024; new text end new text begin (2) "maximum amount" means $20,000,000; and new text end new text begin (3) "stadium" has the meaning given in section 437J.03, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end